Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.250

Traffic infraction, transit infraction, and civil infraction cases—Diversion agreements.

A traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction case involving a juvenile under the age of sixteen may be diverted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or filed in juvenile court.

(1) If a notice of a traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction is filed in juvenile court, the juvenile named in the notice shall be afforded the same due process afforded to adult defendants in traffic infraction cases.

(2) A monetary penalty imposed upon a juvenile under the age of sixteen who is found to have committed a traffic infraction, transit infraction, or civil infraction may not exceed one hundred dollars. At the juvenile's request, the court may order performance of a number of hours of community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty, at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(3) A diversion agreement entered into by a juvenile referred pursuant to this section shall be limited to thirty hours of community restitution, or educational or informational sessions.

(4) Traffic infractions, transit infractions, or civil infractions referred to a youth court pursuant to this section are subject to the conditions imposed by RCW 13.40.630.

(5) A diversion agreement entered into by a juvenile referred pursuant to this section may include a requirement that the juvenile participate in a district or municipal youth court program under chapter 3.72 RCW, provided the youth court program accepts the referral and only subject to the following conditions:

(a) Upon entering the diversion agreement, the juvenile shall be referred to the youth court program, the completion of which shall be the only condition of the diversion agreement;

(b) The juvenile shall not serve more than thirty hours of participation in the youth court program;

(c) Other than filing a petition for termination of the diversion agreement in juvenile court, nothing concerning the juvenile's participation in the youth court program shall be filed in any public court file concerning the juvenile's participation or presence in the youth court program. The only written record of participation shall be the diversion agreement entered into with the juvenile court, subject to confidentiality under chapter 13.50 RCW. No court cause number shall be assigned to the case against the juvenile while he or she participates in the youth court program. The proceedings in the youth court program shall be on open record and may be recorded if necessary;

(d) Nothing concerning the alleged offense or the diversion shall be reported to the department of licensing;

(e) The youth court program may refer the juvenile back to the juvenile diversion unit for termination of the diversion agreement due to noncompliance at any time prior to completion; and

(f) The juvenile court diversion unit shall maintain primary jurisdiction over supervision of the juvenile during his or her participation in the youth court program. The youth court shall notify the diversion unit upon completion of the youth court program and the diversion agreement shall be complete.

[ 2020 c 191 s 5. Prior: 2002 c 237 s 19; 2002 c 175 s 28; 1997 c 338 s 36; 1980 c 128 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Effective date—Severability—1980 c 128: See notes following RCW 46.63.060.